Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1788.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1513 of Title 74 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 1513. Operating program.* * *(f.1) Additional minimum system performance criteria.--(1) The department shall establish additional minimum 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 system performance criteria for an applicable authority to improve fare evasion, public-private transportation partnerships and bus routes. The department shall promulgate regulations, including temporary regulations, to establish the minimum system performance criteria based upon comparison of the award recipient to the applicable authority's past performance and to the applicable authority's peers that an award recipient must satisfy.(2) Failure of the applicable authority to satisfy the minimum system performance criteria established under paragraph (1) shall result in application of the procedure in subsection (g).* * *(i) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "applicable authority" means the transportation authority of the metropolitan area as defined in section 1701 (relating to definitions) and the local transportation organization organized and existing under the act of April 6, 1956 (1955 P.L.1414, No.465), known as the Second Class County Port Authority Act.Section 2. Title 74 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1787. Supplemental performance reporting.(a) Review.--In addition to any audits or financial statements required by the Federal or State Government or a county in this Commonwealth, an applicable authority shall be subject to the following performance reporting requirements:(1) At least once annually, the Legislative Budget and Finance Committee shall review the procedures and audits of the applicable authority and produce a report on its findings.(2) The Legislative Budget and Finance Committee shall 20250HB1788PN2206 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 make the report under subsection (b) available to the public on the publicly accessible Internet website of the Legislative Budget and Finance Committee.(b) Transmission.--The Legislative Budget and Finance Committee, in collaboration with an applicable authority, shall present a report to the Transportation Committee of the Senate and the Transportation Committee of the House of Representatives no later than February 1 of every other year. The report shall include the following:(1) The progress of the applicable authority on achieving fiscal solvency or profitability.(2) The usage of any funds appropriated by the Commonwealth to the applicable authority.(3) Any other information the Legislative Budget and Finance Committee deems necessary.(c) Construction.--This section shall not be construed to prohibit more frequent reviews of an applicable authority's use of funds appropriated.(d) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "applicable authority" means the transportation authority of the metropolitan area as defined in section 1701 (relating to definitions) and the local transportation organization organized and existing under the act of April 6, 1956 (1955 P.L.1414, No.465), known as the Second Class County Port Authority Act.Section 3. Title 74 is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 19PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION TRUST FUNDTRANSFER AND ANNUAL INCREASESec.1901. Scope of chapter.20250HB1788PN2206 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 1902. Definitions.1903. Transfers.1904. Funds established.1905. Issuance of bonds.1906. Annual increase.§ 1901. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to the Public Transportation Trust Fund transfer and annual increase.§ 1902. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Authority." The Commonwealth Financing Authority."Board." The board of directors of the authority."Department." The Department of Transportation of the Commonwealth."Local transportation organization." As defined in section 1503 (relating to definitions)."Project fund." The Road and Bridge Project Fund established under section 1904(a) (relating to funds established)."Project sinking fund." The Road and Bridge Project Sinking Fund established under section 1904(b)."Secretary." The Secretary of Transportation of the Commonwealth."Tax Reform Code." The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.§ 1903. Transfers.Notwithstanding section 1506(c)(1) (relating to fund):(1) 6.15% of the amount collected under Article II of the Tax Reform Code shall be deposited into the Public 20250HB1788PN2206 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Transportation Trust Fund annually by the 20th day of each month for the preceding month.(2) Subject to section 1904(c)(2) (relating to funds established), up to 0.25% of the amount collected under Article II of the Tax Reform Code shall be deposited into the project sinking fund annually by the 20th day of each month for the preceding month.§ 1904. Funds established.(a) Road and Bridge Project Fund.--The Road and Bridge Project Fund is established in the State Treasury for the purpose of funding projects related to the construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, maintenance and repair of roads and bridges in this Commonwealth.(b) Road and Bridge Project Sinking Fund.--The Road and Bridge Project Sinking Fund is established in the State Treasury for the purpose of the repayment of bonds issued under this chapter.(c) Operations generally.--(1) All money deposited into the project fund and interest and other earnings on the money in the project fund are appropriated to the department on a continuing basis to carry out the purposes described under subsection (a).(2) All money deposited into the project sinking fund and interest and other earnings on the money in the project sinking fund are appropriated to the authority on a continuing basis to carry out the purposes described under subsection (b).§ 1905. Issuance of bonds.(a) Principal amounts.--The authority may issue its bonds, notes or other obligations in principal amounts as in the 20250HB1788PN2206 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 judgment of the authority shall be necessary, but not to exceed a total sum of $325,000,000, to provide sufficient money for:(1) The payment, funding or refunding of the principal of or interest or redemption premiums on any bonds issued by the authority, whether the bonds to be funded or refunded have or have not become due.(2) The establishment or increase of reserves to secure or to pay the bonds or interest on the bonds.(3) All other costs or expenses of the authority incident to and necessary to carry out the purposes under this chapter.(b) Negotiable instrument designation.--Whether or not the bonds are of a form and character as to be negotiable instruments under the terms of 13 Pa.C.S. (relating to commercial code), the bonds are made negotiable instruments within the meaning of and for the purposes of 13 Pa.C.S., subject only to the provisions of the bonds for registration.(c) Resolution and terms of bonds.--Bonds shall be authorized by resolution of the board, may be issued in one or more series and shall bear any date or dates, mature at any time or times, bear interest at any rate or rates or at variable rates, be in any denomination or denominations, be in any form, either coupon or registered, carry any conversion or registration privileges, have any rank or priority, be executed in any manner, be payable from such sources in any medium of payment at any place or places within or without this Commonwealth and be subject to any terms of redemption, purchase or tender by the authority or the holders thereof, with our OR without premium, as the resolution or resolutions may provide. A resolution of the authority authorizing the issuance of bonds 20250HB1788PN2206 - 6 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 may provide that the bonds be secured by a trust indenture between the authority and a trustee, vesting in the trustee any property, rights, powers and duties in trust consistent with the provisions of this act as the authority may determine. The resolution may further provide for the acquisition of credit enhancement devices such as bond insurance, letters of credit or any other instruments to carry out the provisions of this section.(d) Public or private sale.--Bonds shall be sold initially at public sale at any price or prices and in any manner as the authority may determine, subject to the requirement that the chairperson shall ensure that minority-owned or minority-controlled firms shall have an opportunity to participate to a significant degree in any bond sale activities. Any portion of any bond issue so offered and not sold or subscribed for may be disposed of by private sale by the authority in the manner and at the prices as the authority shall direct.(e) No prior preconditions on bond issuance.--Bonds may be issued under this chapter without obtaining the consent of any department, division, board, bureau or agency of the Commonwealth and without any other proceeding or the happening of any other conditions or other things than those proceedings, conditions or things which are specifically required by this chapter.(f) Limitation on obligations.--Bonds issued this chapter shall not be a debt or liability of the Commonwealth or of any of its political subdivisions other than the authority and shall not create or constitute any indebtedness, liability or obligation of the Commonwealth or of any political subdivision. All bonds shall be payable solely from revenues or funds pledged 20250HB1788PN2206 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or available for their payment as authorized in this chapter, including the proceeds of any issue of bonds. Each bond shall contain on its face a statement to the effect that the authority is obligated to pay the principal thereof or the interest thereon only from its revenues, receipts or funds pledged or available for their payment as authorized in this chapter, that neither the Commonwealth nor any political subdivisions are obligated to pay the principal or interest and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the Commonwealth or any political subdivision is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on the bonds.(g) Nature of obligation and payment.--Each issue of bonds may, if it is determined by the authority, be general obligations of the authority payable out of any revenues, receipts or funds of the authority, or special obligations payable out of particular revenues, receipts or funds, subject only to agreements with the holders of the bonds. Bonds may be secured by one or more of the following:(1) Pledges of revenues and other receipts to be derived from the payment of the interest on and any principal of notes and bonds issued by one or more governmental units and purchased by the authority, and any other payment made to the authority pursuant to agreements with any governmental unit or a pledge or assignment of any notes and bonds of any governmental units, and the rights and interest of the authority therein.(2) Pledges of loan payments, rentals, other revenues to be derived from loan agreements, leases or other contractual arrangements with any person or entity, public or private, or a pledged PLEDGE or assignment of any of the loan agreements, 20250HB1788PN2206 - 8 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 leases or other contractual arrangements, and the rights and interest of the authority therein.(3) Pledges of grants, subsidies, contributions, appropriations or other payments to be received from the Federal Government or any instrumentality thereof or from the Commonwealth, any Commonwealth agency or other governmental unit.(4) Pledges of all moneys, funds, accounts, securities and other funds, including the proceeds of the bonds.(5) Mortgages and security interests covering all or part of any project or other property of any person or entity, real or personal, then owned or thereafter to be acquired, or a pledge or assignment of mortgages and security interest made or granted to the authority by any person or entity, and the rights and interests of the authority therein.(h) Exemption from taxation.--All bonds and notes issued under this section shall be exempt from taxation for State and local purposes.§ 1906. Annual increase.Notwithstanding section 1513(c)(3) and (d)(2) (relating to operating program), the total financial assistance provided to each local transportation organization may exceed 20% of the prior year allocation and the secretary may adjust and hold harmless the amount of annual increase in local match under section 1513(d)(2) for a period of five fiscal years beginning in fiscal year 2025-2026.Section 4. Title 74 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 9107.1. Applicable authority.(a) Duty to submit projects to board.--Not later than 90 20250HB1788PN2206 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 days after the effective date of this section, an applicable authority shall submit one or more transportation projects to the board for consideration involving one or more transportation facilities.(b) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "applicable authority" means the transportation authority of the metropolitan area as defined in section 1701 (relating to definitions) and the local transportation organization organized and existing under the act of April 6, 1956 (1955 P.L.1414, No.465), known as the Second Class County Port Authority Act.Section 5. Section 4307(g) of Title 75 is amended by adding a definition and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 4307. Use and display of illuminated signs.* * *(f.2) Public transportation vehicles.--(1) A public transportation vehicle may carry on the rear or side of the vehicle illuminated signs, or surfaces designed to be illuminated signs, placed so as not to interfere with the vision of the driver through the rear window, if any, of the vehicle.(2) Illuminated signs, or surfaces designed to be illuminated signs, placed under paragraph (1) shall be of a size and type designed not to interfere with or unduly distract drivers of other vehicles on the highway. The sign or surface may:(i) Include features that enhance road safety, including enhanced turn signals and brake lights, by connecting the sign or surface to a vehicle operation indicator.20250HB1788PN2206 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Be able to communicate with the public through real-time, geofenced and global-positioning-system-enabled technology by providing information and advertising to the public, including public service announcements and emergency alerts.(3) The size and placement of the sign or surface must be approved by the department or be of a type approved by the department prior to use on the vehicle.(g) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Public transportation vehicle." A vehicle used for the purpose of public passenger transportation or a transportation system under 74 Pa.C.S. Chs. 15 (relating to sustainable mobility options) and 17 (relating to metropolitan transportation authorities) and operated by, or under an agreement with, a public entity, including an airport, a port authority, a public transit agency, a State-owned institution or a State-related institution or another Federal, State, county or local government entity or agency. The term includes a bus, light rail or a train. The term does not include a school bus or a vehicle used for charter or sightseeing services.Section 6. Section 9511.12 of Title 75 is amended to read:§ 9511.12. [(Reserved).] Supplemental funding for three and four digit highway construction.(a) Three and Four Digit State Route Account established.--The Three and Four Digit State Route Account is established as a restricted account in the Motor License Fund. Money in the account is appropriated to the department on the continuing 20250HB1788PN2206 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 basis for use consistent with this section.(b) Deposits.--The following shall be deposited into the account:(1) All interest earned on the money in the account.(2) Money transferred from the Motor License Fund under subsection (c).(c) Transfers.--(1) Not later than 15 days after the effective date of this subsection, the Secretary of the Budget shall transfer unrestricted revenue in the Motor License Fund to the account in an amount equal to $150,000,000.(2) Not later than July 15, 2026, the Secretary of the Budget shall transfer unrestricted revenue in the Motor License Fund to the account in an amount equal to $125,000,000.(d) Use.--(1) Money in the account shall be used to supplement and not supplant money otherwise available for eligible highway and bridge projects.(2) The department shall prioritize eligible highway and bridge projects funded through the account based on condition and prepare a plan to deliver projects in an equitable manner and in conformance with this section. The department shall post the eligible highway and bridge projects and plan on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(3) Eligible highway and bridge projects funded through the account must be bid using the department's engineering and construction management system.(4) Eligible highway and bridge projects shall be completed within five years.20250HB1788PN2206 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) Money in the account may not be used for bridge maintenance.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Account." The Three and Four Digit State Route Account established in subsection (a)."Eligible highway and bridge project." A project to construct, reconstruct or resurface a highway or bridge within the department's three or four digit State Route highway system. The term shall include necessary design costs.Section 7. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The amendment or addition of 74 Pa.C.S. §§ 1513(f.1) and (i), 1787 and 9107.1 and 75 Pa.C.S. §§ 4307(f.2) and (g) and 9511.12 shall take effect in 60 days.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1788PN2206 - 13 - 1234567891011121314151617